Tennessee, session 114, HB2438.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 15, Chapter 2, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
November 9 of each year is to be observed as "Gold Star Father's Day," to honor
and recognize fathers who have lost children in service to the United States as members
of the United States armed forces. This day shall not be a legal holiday as defined in §
15-1-101.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012268